tables/ko-2020-context.cti
always 휘옡 245-134-1235-36-34-236
always 휘옢 245-134-1235-36-34-256
always 휘옣 245-134-1235-36-34-356
always 휴예 245-146-36-34
always 휴옉 245-146-36-34-1
always 휴옊 245-146-36-34-1-1
always 휴옋 245-146-36-34-1-3
always 휴옌 245-146-36-34-25
always 휴옍 245-146-36-34-25-13
always 휴옎 245-146-36-34-25-356
always 휴옏 245-146-36-34-35
always 휴옐 245-146-36-34-2
always 휴옑 245-146-36-34-2-1
always 휴옒 245-146-36-34-2-26
always 휴옓 245-146-36-34-2-12
always 휴옔 245-146-36-34-2-3
always 휴옕 245-146-36-34-2-236
always 휴옖 245-146-36-34-2-256
always 휴옗 245-146-36-34-2-356
always 휴옘 245-146-36-34-26
always 휴옙 245-146-36-34-12
always 휴옚 245-146-36-34-12-3
always 휴옛 245-146-36-34-3
always 휴옜 245-146-36-34-34
always 휴옝 245-146-36-34-2356
always 휴옞 245-146-36-34-13
always 휴옟 245-146-36-34-23
always 휴옠 245-146-36-34-235
always 휴옡 245-146-36-34-236
always 휴옢 245-146-36-34-256
always 휴옣 245-146-36-34-356
always 흐예 245-246-36-34
always 흐옉 245-246-36-34-1
always 흐옊 245-246-36-34-1-1
always 흐옋 245-246-36-34-1-3
always 흐옌 245-246-36-34-25
always 흐옍 245-246-36-34-25-13
always 흐옎 245-246-36-34-25-356
always 흐옏 245-246-36-34-35
always 흐옐 245-246-36-34-2
always 흐옑 245-246-36-34-2-1
always 흐옒 245-246-36-34-2-26
always 흐옓 245-246-36-34-2-12
always 흐옔 245-246-36-34-2-3
always 흐옕 245-246-36-34-2-236
always 흐옖 245-246-36-34-2-256
always 흐옗 245-246-36-34-2-356
always 흐옘 245-246-36-34-26
always 흐옙 245-246-36-34-12
always 흐옚 245-246-36-34-12-3
always 흐옛 245-246-36-34-3
always 흐옜 245-246-36-34-34
always 흐옝 245-246-36-34-2356
always 흐옞 245-246-36-34-13
always 흐옟 245-246-36-34-23
always 흐옠 245-246-36-34-235
always 흐옡 245-246-36-34-236
always 흐옢 245-246-36-34-256
always 흐옣 245-246-36-34-356
always 희예 245-2456-36-34
always 희옉 245-2456-36-34-1
always 희옊 245-2456-36-34-1-1
always 희옋 245-2456-36-34-1-3
always 희옌 245-2456-36-34-25
always 희옍 245-2456-36-34-25-13
always 희옎 245-2456-36-34-25-356
always 희옏 245-2456-36-34-35
always 희옐 245-2456-36-34-2
always 희옑 245-2456-36-34-2-1
always 희옒 245-2456-36-34-2-26
always 희옓 245-2456-36-34-2-12
always 희옔 245-2456-36-34-2-3
always 희옕 245-2456-36-34-2-236
always 희옖 245-2456-36-34-2-256
always 희옗 245-2456-36-34-2-356
always 희옘 245-2456-36-34-26
always 희옙 245-2456-36-34-12
always 희옚 245-2456-36-34-12-3
always 희옛 245-2456-36-34-3
always 희옜 245-2456-36-34-34
always 희옝 245-2456-36-34-2356
always 희옞 245-2456-36-34-13
always 희옟 245-2456-36-34-23
always 희옠 245-2456-36-34-235
always 희옡 245-2456-36-34-236
always 희옢 245-2456-36-34-256
always 희옣 245-2456-36-34-356
always 히예 245-135-36-34
always 히옉 245-135-36-34-1
always 히옊 245-135-36-34-1-1
always 히옋 245-135-36-34-1-3
always 히옌 245-135-36-34-25
always 히옍 245-135-36-34-25-13
always 히옎 245-135-36-34-25-356
always 히옏 245-135-36-34-35
always 히옐 245-135-36-34-2
always 히옑 245-135-36-34-2-1
always 히옒 245-135-36-34-2-26
always 히옓 245-135-36-34-2-12
always 히옔 245-135-36-34-2-3
always 히옕 245-135-36-34-2-236
always 히옖 245-135-36-34-2-256
always 히옗 245-135-36-34-2-356
always 히옘 245-135-36-34-26
always 히옙 245-135-36-34-12
always 히옚 245-135-36-34-12-3
always 히옛 245-135-36-34-3
always 히옜 245-135-36-34-34
always 히옝 245-135-36-34-2356
always 히옞 245-135-36-34-13
always 히옟 245-135-36-34-23
always 히옠 245-135-36-34-235
always 히옡 245-135-36-34-236
always 히옢 245-135-36-34-256
always 히옣 245-135-36-34-356
